irish.foma
### irish.foma ###

## ALPHABET ##
define SlenderV [ e | é | i | í ];
define BroadV [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú ];
define V [ SlenderV | BroadV ];

define LenC [ b | c | d | f | g | m | p | s | t ];
define EclC [ b | c | d | f | g | p | t ];
define C [ LenC | EclC | [ h | l | n | r ]];

define Alpha [ V | C ];

define LenTag [ "+" L e n ];
define EclTag [ "+" E c l ];
define PrefixDTag [ "+" P r e f i x D ];

## BASE LEXICON ##
# change this path to wherever the lexicon file is stored
read lexc \Users\James\Downloads\LING 8580\Project\irish.lexc
define Lexicon ;

# lenition and eclipsis
define SClusterBlocking [ LenTag -> 0 || .#. s C ?* _ ];
define Lenition SClusterBlocking .o.
				[ [..] -> h || .#. LenC _ ?* LenTag ] .o. 
				[ LenTag -> 0 ];

define Eclipsis [ [..] -> m || .#. _ b ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ [..] -> n || .#. _ d ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ [..] -> n || .#. _ g ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ [..] -> b h || .#. _ f ?* EclTag ] .o. 
				[ [..] -> b || .#. _ p ?* EclTag ] .o. 
				[ [..] -> d || .#. _ t ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ [..] -> g || .#. _ c ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ [..] -> n "-" || .#. _ V ?* EclTag ] .o.
				[ EclTag -> 0 ];

# tag removal
define PrefixD	[ [..] -> d ' || .#. _ [ V | f h ] ?* PrefixDTag ] .o.
				[ PrefixDTag -> 0 ];

# wk2 verbs
define DeleteIgh [ i g h -> 0 || _ "^" ];

# syncope
define Syncope [ V+ -> 0 || V [ C - h ] (h) _ C "^" V ];

# slender/broad endings
define SbjnctA 	[ A -> a || BroadV C* "^" _ ] .o.
				[ A -> e || SlenderV C* "^" _ ];
define EInsertion [ [..] -> e || SlenderV C* "^" (C) _ [ a | á ]];
define SlenderLongO [ ó -> e o || SlenderV C* "^" _ ];
define AInsertion [ [..] -> a || BroadV C* "^" (C) _ [ i | í ]];

# misc phonology
define ADeletion 	[ a -> 0 || _ "^" [ ó | a ]] .o.
					[ a -> 0 || ó "^" _ ];
define EDeletion	[ e -> 0 || é "^" _ ];
define DoubleDentals [ t (h) -> 0 || _ "^" t ];
define DoubleI [ [ i | í ] -> 0 || [ i | í ] "^" _ ];

define Cleanup [ "^" -> 0 ];

## EXCEPTIONS ##
define IndividualExcept [	
			[{tarlaigh} "+V" "+Past" [["+1P" | "+2P" | "+3P"] "+Sg" | "+2P" "+Pl"] .x. {tharla}] |
			[{dóigh} "+V" ["+Present" | "+Imprt" ] "+Aut" .x. {dóitear}] |
			[{dóigh} "+V" "+PastImpf" "+2P" "+Sg" .x. {dhóiteá}] |
			[{dóigh} "+V" "+PastImpf" "+Aut" .x. {dhóití}] |
			[{dóigh} "+V" "+Imprt" "+2P" "+Pl" .x. {dóigí}] |
			[{dóigh} "+V" "+Sbjnct" "+Aut" .x. {ndóitear}]];
